Wisconsin, session 2025, SB779.
do enact as follows:SB779,11Section 1. 97.303 of the statutes is created to read:SB779,2,3297.303 Serving food and beverages in foam polystyrene packaging. 3(1) Definitions. In this section:SB779,2,54(a) “Foam polystyrene packaging” means packaging made primarily from 5foam polystyrene that is designed for serving or containing food or beverage.SB779,2,76(b) “Retail food business operator” means a person who operates a retail food 7establishment, as defined in s. 97.30 (1) (c), or a vending machine operator.SB779,2,98(2) Prohibition. (a) Except as provided in par. (b), no retail food business 9operator may serve food or beverages in foam polystyrene packaging.SB779,2,1010(b) Paragraph (a) does not apply to any of the following:SB779,2,12111. A container enclosing food or beverage that has been filled and sealed 12outside this state before receipt by a retail food business operator.SB779,2,14132. A container used for packaging raw meat, poultry, fish, or seafood to be 14consumed off the premises where sold.SB779,2,2215(3) Waiver. Notwithstanding sub. (2) (a), the department may grant to a 16retail food business operator a waiver authorizing activity prohibited under sub. (2) 17(a) if the department determines that the waiver is necessary to avoid an undue 18hardship or practical difficulty for the retail food business operator that is not 19common among similarly situated retail food business operators. A waiver granted 20under this subsection may not authorize activity prohibited under sub. (2) (a) that 21occurs on or after the first day of the 13th month beginning after the effective date 22of this subsection .... [LRB inserts date].SB779,3,51(4) Penalties. A person who violates sub. (2) (a) more than 90 days after 2receiving written notice from the department that the person has violated sub. (2) 3(a) shall forfeit not more than $250, except that for each subsequent violation 4occurring more than 180 days after receiving the written notice the person shall 5forfeit $500.SB779,26Section 2. Effective date.SB779,3,87(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 13th month beginning after 8publication.SB779,3,99